bg-BG: Тип прилягане на покривалото за голф количка: За 2-ма пътници; За 4-ма пътници; За 6-има пътници; За 8-има пътници; Универсално/регулируемо прилягане; Друго
sk-SK: Typ krytu golfového vozíka: 2-miestne; 4-miestne; 6-miestne; 8-miestne; Univerzálny/nastaviteľný strih; Iné
sv: Passformstyp för golfbilskapsling: 2-sits; 4-sits; 6-sits; 8-sits; Universell/justerbar passform; Annan
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งโครงกั้นที่นั่งสำหรับรถกอล์ฟ: 2 ที่นั่ง; 4 ที่นั่ง; 6 ที่นั่ง; 8 ที่นั่ง; ขนาดมาตรฐานครอบจักรวาล/ปรับได้; อื่นๆ
hu: Golfkocsi-burkolat illesztési típusa: 2 személyes; 4 személyes; 6 személyes; 8 személyes; Univerzális/állítható; Egyéb
fr: Type d’ajustement de l’habillage de voiturette de golf: 2 passagers; 4 passagers; 6 passagers; 8 passagers; Coupe universelle/ajustable; Autre
es: Tipo de calce de la cubierta del carrito de golf: 2 pasajeros; 4 pasajeros; 6 pasajeros; 8 pasajeros; Ajuste universal/regulable; Otro
cs: Typ ohrady golfového vozíku: Pro 2 osoby; Pro 4 osoby; Pro 6 osob; Pro 8 osob; Univerzální/nastavitelný tvar; Ostatní
lt-LT: Golfo vežimėlio gaubto pritaikymo tipas: 2 keleivių; 4 keleivių; 6 keleivių; 8 keleivių; Universalus / reguliuojamas; Kita
ja: ゴルフカート用エンクロージャー適合タイプ: 2人乗り; 4人乗り; 6人乗り; 8人乗り; ユニバーサル/調整可能フィット; その他
de: Passformtyp des Golfcart-Gehäuses: 2-Sitzer; 4-Sitzer; 6-Sitzer; 8-Sitzer; Universelle/Anpassbare Passform; Andere
fi: Golfauton suojan istuvuus: 2 matkustajaa; 4 matkustajaa; 6 matkustajaa; 8 matkustajaa; Universaali/säädettävä istuvuus; Muu
it: Tipo di copertura per carrello da golf: 2 posti; 4 posti; 6 posti; 8 posti; Vestibilità universale/regolabile; Altro
sl-SI: Vrsta prileganja zaščitne kabine za voziček za golf: Za 2 potnika; Za 4 potnike; Za 6 potnikov; Za 8 potnikov; Univerzalno/prilagodljivo prileganje; Drugo
nl: Golfkar afscherming passingstype: 2-persoons; 4-persoons; 6-persoons; 8-persoons; Universele/verstelbare pasvorm; Anders
el: Τύπος εφαρμογής περιβλήματος αμαξιδίου γκολφ: 2 επιβατών; 4 επιβατών; 6 επιβατών; 8 επιβατών; Γενικής χρήσης/ρυθμιζόμενη εφαρμογή; Άλλο
pl: Typ dopasowania obudowy wózka golfowego: 2-osobowy; 4-osobowy; 6-osobowy; 8-osobowy; Uniwersalny / regulowany; Inny
vi: Loại khớp nối của vỏ xe golf: 2 hành khách; 4 hành khách; 6 hành khách; 8 hành khách; Kiểu vừa đa năng/điều chỉnh được; Khác
ru: Тип гольф-кара по пассажирам: Двухместный; Четырехместный; Шестиместный; Восьмиместный; Универсальный/регулируемый размер; Другое
zh-CN: 高尔夫球车舱罩适配类型: 2 人座; 4 人座; 6 人座; 8 人座; 通用/可调节尺寸; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta kućišta za golf košaricu: Za 2 putnika; Za 4 putnika; Za 6 putnika; Za 8 putnika; Univerzalni / prilagodljivi kroj; Ostalo
pt-PT: tipo de encaixe da cabine do carrinho de golfe: 2 passageiros; 4 passageiros; 6 passageiros; 8 passageiros; Ajuste universal/ajustável; Outro
nb: Golf handlekurv kabinett passform type: 2-seter; 4-seter; 6-seter; 8-seter; Universell / justerbar passform; Annet
ro-RO: Tip de carcasă pentru golf: 2 pasageri; 4 pasageri; 6 pasageri; 8 pasageri; Ajustare universală/reglabilă; Altele
en: Golf cart enclosure fit type: 2-passenger; 4-passenger; 6-passenger; 8-passenger; Universal/adjustable fit; Other
zh-TW: 高爾夫球車車廂罩適配類型: 2 人座; 4 人座; 6 人座; 8 人座; 通用/可調式版型; 其他
da: Pasformstype for golfvognsovertræk: 2 passagerer; 4 passagerer; 6 passagerer; 8 passagerer; Universel/justerbar pasform; Anden
ko: 골프 카트 인클로저 적합 유형: 2인승; 4인승; 6인승; 8인승; 범용/조절형 핏; 기타
pt-BR: Cabine de carrinho de golfe tipo de encaixe: 2 passageiros; 4 passageiros; 6 passageiros; 8 passageiros; Ajuste universal/ajustável; Outro
tr: Golf sepeti muhafaza tipi: 2 yolcu; 4 yolcu; 6 yolcu; 8 yolcu; Evrensel/ayarlanabilir uyum; Diğer